Missouri, session 2026, HB2190.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 210, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 210.212, to read as follows:
210.212. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Aquatic activity", an activity involving a pool or other body of water,
including canoeing, that may expose a child to a risk of serious injury because of the
inherent danger of the activity;
(2) "Camp counselor", an employee of a summer camp who interacts with and is
responsible for the supervision and safety of children at a summer camp and engages in
activities including, but not limited to, planning and leading group events, maintaining a
schedule of activities for children at the camp, and responding to safety or behavioral
incidents;
(3) "Medical emergency", an injury or the sudden and, at the time, unexpected
onset of a health condition that manifests itself by symptoms of sufficient severity that
would lead a prudent layperson, possessing an average knowledge of health and
medicine, to believe that the absence of immediate medical care could result in:
(a) Placing the person's health in significant jeopardy;
(b) Serious impairment to a bodily function;
(c) Serious dysfunction of any bodily organ or part; or
(d) Inadequately controlled pain;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2190 2
(4) "Summer camp", a program operated from May to September by a person
or organization with the primary function of providing a summer recreational program
for children five years of age or older and providing no child care for children under five
years of age in the same space or in the same outdoor play area simultaneously.
"Summer camp" shall not include any religion-based summer camp.
2. Any person or organization operating a summer camp in this state shall
ensure that employees of the summer camp are certified in operating equipment used in
any aquatic activity offered by the summer camp.
3. (1) Any person or organization operating a summer camp in this state shall
establish and retain onsite a written site-specific emergency plan, which shall be
approved by the director of the summer camp, outlining procedures that address the
following emergency situations:
(a) Natural disasters;
(b) A lost child or children;
(c) Fires;
(d) Transportation emergencies;
(e) Medical emergencies;
(f) Unauthorized persons on or near the premises of the summer camp;
(g) Aquatic emergencies, as appropriate for the site; and
(h) Other emergency situations, as appropriate for the site.
(2) Summer camp employees, including the director and camp counselors, shall
be trained in implementing the emergency plan procedures provided for under
subdivision (1) of this subsection.
4. At least fifty percent of the camp counselors employed by a summer camp,
and any director employed by a summer camp, shall be trained in cardiopulmonary
resuscitation and in the use of an automated external defibrillator.
5. Any aquatic activity offered by a summer camp to children attending the
summer camp and any related equipment shall be inspected annually by the relevant
state department including, but not limited to, the department of health and senior
services, the department of public safety, or the department of conservation. Such
inspections may be completed by local agencies if the standards employed by local
personnel are substantially equivalent to state standards and local personnel are
available for enforcement of such standards.
6. The department of elementary and secondary education shall maintain a list
of all licensed summer camps in this state and any complaints against any of those
summer camps. Such information shall be made available to the public.

HB 2190 3
7. It shall be unlawful for any person or organization to establish, maintain, or
operate a summer camp that has not obtained a license under this section from the
department of elementary and secondary education. Every summer camp shall disclose
the licensure status of the camp to the parents or guardians of the children for whom the
camp provides recreation in the summer.
8. Any person or organization operating a summer camp in this state shall
maintain records of all inspections required under subsection 5 of this section of aquatic
activities offered by the summer camp to children attending the summer camp and of
any related equipment.
9. All camp counselors shall be subject to a criminal background check. Such
background check shall include:
(1) A state and Federal Bureau of Investigation fingerprint check;
(2) A search of the National Sex Offender Registry; and
(3) A search of the following registries, repositories, or databases in Missouri,
the state where the camp counselor resides, and each state where such camp counselor
resided during the preceding five years:
(a) The state criminal registry or repository, with the use of fingerprints being
required in the state where the camp counselor resides and optional in other states;
(b) The state sex offender registry or repository;
(c) The state family care safety registry; and
(d) The state-based child abuse and neglect registry and database.
10. Beginning May 1, 2028, any person or organization that violates the
provisions of this section shall be guilty of a class C misdemeanor for the first offense
and shall be assessed a fine not to exceed seven hundred fifty dollars and shall be guilty
of a class A misdemeanor and shall be assessed a fine of up to two thousand dollars per
day, not to exceed a total of ten thousand dollars, for any subsequent offense. If a person
or organization violates the provisions of this section prior to May 1, 2028, the person or
organization shall receive a written warning for each violation.
11. The department of elementary and secondary education may promulgate all
necessary rules and regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or
portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the
authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is
subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of

HB 2190 4
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be
invalid and void.
✔